Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2041.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5372XS (2) 91 je/js S.F. 2041 Section 1. Section 20.9, subsections 1 and 3, Code 2026, are 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. For negotiations regarding a bargaining unit with 3 at least thirty percent of members who are public safety 4 employees, the public employer and the employee organization 5 shall meet at reasonable times, including meetings reasonably 6 in advance of the public employerâs budget-making process, 7 to negotiate in good faith with respect to wages, hours, 8 vacations, insurance, holidays, leaves of absence, shift 9 differentials, overtime compensation, supplemental pay, 10 seniority, transfer procedures, job classifications, health 11 and safety matters, evaluation procedures, procedures for 12 staff reduction, in-service training, grievance procedures 13 for resolving any questions arising under the agreement, 14 terms authorizing dues checkoff for members of the employee 15 organization, and other matters mutually agreed upon. For 16 negotiations regarding a bargaining unit that does not have 17 at least thirty percent of members who are public safety 18 employees, the public employer and the employee organization 19 shall meet at reasonable times, including meetings reasonably 20 in advance of the public employerâs budget-making process, 21 to negotiate in good faith with respect to base wages , 22 terms authorizing dues checkoff for members of the employee 23 organization, and other matters mutually agreed upon. Such 24 obligation to negotiate in good faith does not compel either 25 party to agree to a proposal or make a concession. Mandatory 26 subjects of negotiation specified in this subsection shall be 27 interpreted narrowly and restrictively. 28 3. All retirement systems , dues checkoffs, and other 29 payroll deductions for political action committees or other 30 political contributions or political activities shall be 31 excluded from the scope of negotiations. For negotiations 32 regarding a bargaining unit that does not have at least thirty 33 percent of members who are public safety employees, insurance, 34 leaves of absence for political activities, supplemental pay, 35 -1- LSB 5372XS (2) 91 je/js 1/ 3 S.F. 2041 transfer procedures, evaluation procedures, procedures for 1 staff reduction, and subcontracting public services shall also 2 be excluded from the scope of negotiations. 3 Sec. 2. Section 70A.17A, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 4 following new subsection: 5 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. This section shall not affect a payroll 6 deduction elected by a state employee pursuant to section 7 70A.19. 8 Sec. 3. Section 70A.19, Code 2026, is amended by striking 9 the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 10 70A.19 Duration of state payroll deduction for dues of 11 employee organization member. 12 A state employee who elects a payroll deduction for 13 membership dues to an employee organization pursuant to the 14 provisions of a collective bargaining agreement negotiated 15 under the provisions of chapter 20 shall maintain the deduction 16 for a period of one year or until the expiration of the 17 collective bargaining agreement, whichever occurs first. A 18 state employee who transfers employment to a position covered 19 by a different collective bargaining agreement or who becomes 20 a management employee is not subject to this requirement. 21 With respect to state employees, this section supersedes the 22 provisions of section 20.9 allowing termination of a dues 23 checkoff at any time but does not supersede the requirement for 24 thirty daysâ written notice of termination. 25 Sec. 4. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to collective 26 bargaining procedures pursuant to chapter 20 initiated on or 27 after the effective date of this Act. 28